src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON_HUM_COLL_PERS
+PxPl1:ным PRON_HUM_COLL_CASES ;
+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нум PRON_HUM_COLL_CASES ;
+PxPl2:ныд PRON_HUM_COLL_CASES ;
+PxPl3:ныс PRON_HUM_COLL_CASES ;
!
ACC_PXPL1/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
ACC_PXPL2/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
ACC_PXPL3/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON_HUM_COLL_CASES
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 PRON_HUM_OBL ;

LEXICON PRON_NONHUM
CASE/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

LEXICON CASE/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
 ABL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ACC_PXSG1/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ACC_PXSG3/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 APR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 CMPR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 CNS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 DAT/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 EGR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 GEN/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ILL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 INE/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 INS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 PRL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 TER/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 TRA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;



! Removing 2012-02-08 The comparative can be taken care of once
! LEXICON INTERR_REL_INDEF_COMPARISON
! +Comp:%>джык INTERR_REL ;
!               INTERR_REL ;

LEXICON Ill4INTERR_REL_INDEF
+Ill: INTERR_REL_INDEF ;

LEXICON EgrIll4INTERR_REL_INDEF
+Egr+Ill: INTERR_REL_INDEF ;

LEXICON Egr4INTERR_REL_INDEF
+Egr: INTERR_REL_INDEF ;

LEXICON Tra4INTERR_REL_INDEF
+Tra: INTERR_REL_INDEF ;

LEXICON TraEgr4INTERR_REL_INDEF
+Tra+Egr: INTERR_REL_INDEF ;

LEXICON Ter4INTERR_REL_INDEF
+Ter: INTERR_REL_INDEF ;

LEXICON INTERR_REL_INDEF ! 3 types of pronouns are congregated here
 PRON_INDEFTAG ; ! This leads to a variety of indefinite pronouns
 INTERR_REL ; ! This leads to a split between relative and interrogative pronouns

LEXICON INTERR_REL
+Interr: COMPARATIVE ;
+Rel: K ;

LEXICON PRON_INDEFTAG !SHOULD THIS BE REMOVED 2020-10-13
+Der/kw+Indef:%>кӧ K ;
+Der/sjurw+Indef:%>сюрӧ K ;
+Der/kw+IndefErr/Orth-e-not-oe+Err/Dial:%>ке K ;
+Der/sjurw+Indef+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Err/Dial:%>сюре K ;


! Indefinite pronouns
 
LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG
+Indef: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG_KO
+Indef+Sg: PRONINDEF_PERS_KO_CX ;
+Indef+Pl:%>ъяс PRONINDEF_PERS_KO_CX ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF_PERS_KO_CX
+Nom: INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Acc:%>ӧс INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Gen:%>лӧн INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Gen+Err/Dial:%>лэн INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Abl:%>лысь INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Dat:%>лы INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Ins:%>ӧн INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Ela:%>ысь INDEF_IN_KO ; !2011-10-19 It might be that this only has to do with мый _what_ and мыйыськӧ _for some reason_
+Com:%>кӧд INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Com+Err/Dial:%>кед INDEF_IN_KO ;
+Egr:%>сянь INDEF_IN_KO ;

LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG_SJURO
+Indef: PRONINDEF_PERS_SJURO_CX ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF_PERS_SJURO_CX
+Nom: INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Acc:%>ӧс INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Gen:%>лӧн INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Gen+Err/Dial:%>лэн INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Abl:%>лысь INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Dat:%>лы INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Ins:%>ӧн INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Ela:%>ысь INDEF_IN_SJURO ; !2011-10-19 It might be that this only has to do with мый _what_ and мыйыськӧ _for some reason_
+Com:%>кӧд INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Com+Err/Dial:%>кед INDEF_IN_SJURO ;
+Egr:%>сянь INDEF_IN_SJURO ;


LEXICON IS_PRON_INDEF_KO
+Der/kw+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON_INDEF_SJURO
+Der/sjurw+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON_INTERR
+Interr: K ;


!2018-10-21!LEXICON PRON_SPAT
!2018-10-21!: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON PRON_RECIPR
+Recipr: PRON_RECIPR_CASE ;

LEXICON PRON_RECIPR_CASE
+Cmpl: WordEnd ; !CHECKME 2019-10-27 is this same as Sg Nom
+Cmpl+PxSg2:ыд K ;
+Cmpl+PxSg2:ыс K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl1:ным K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нум K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl2:ныд K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl3:ныс K ;
+Gen:лӧн K ;
+Gen+Err/Dial:лэн K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl3:ныслысь K ;
+Dat:лы COMPARATIVE ;
+Dat+PxSg3:ыслы COMPARATIVE ;
+Dat+PxPl3:ныслы COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc:%>ӧс COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxSg2:тӧ COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxSg2+Err/Dial:тэ COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумес COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxPl2:нытӧ COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxPl3:ныссӧ COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxPl2+Err/Dial:нытэ COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxPl3+Err/Dial:ныссэ COMPARATIVE ;
+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Dial:сэ COMPARATIVE ;

!+Acc2+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
!+Acc3+PxPl3:ныссӧ K ;
!+Acc3:сӧ K ;
+Com+PxSg3:ыскӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl2:ныдкӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl3:ныскӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg3+Err/Dial:ыскед K ;
+Com+PxPl2+Err/Dial:ныдкед K ;
+Com+PxPl3+Err/Dial:ныскед K ;
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ;
+Car+PxSg3+Err/Dial:тэгыс K ;
+Ela:ысь K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:сьыныд K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:сьыныс K ;
+Ill+PxSg3:ас K ; ! Here is a good problem: Should there be a special tag
                ! for the illative-inessive forms
+Ill+PxPl3:нысӧ K ;
+Ill+PxPl3+Err/Dial:нысэ K ;

+Abl+PxPl2:ныдлысь K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:ныдлы K ;

+Com:кӧд K ;
+Com+Err/Dial:кед K ;
+Ins:%>ӧн K ;
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:сяньныд K ;


LEXICON PRON_REL
+Rel: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_IN_LADOR
+Refl+Der/lador: Noun1 ; !2011-11-22

LEXICON REFL_AS !! * = @CODE@ ас:а 
+Det+Refl:с ABS_ ; !ас is an absolute-form modifer
+Refl:  REFL_AS_01 ;
+Refl+Ins:сӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3
+Refl+Ins+Err/Dial:сэн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3

!+Poss+Sg1:слам PRON_POSS  "minun oma -ni" ;
!+Poss+Sg2:слад PRON_POSS  "sinun oma -si" ;
!+Poss+Sg3:слас PRON_POSS  "hänen oma -nsa/ sen oma" ;
!+Poss+Pl1:сланым PRON_POSS  "meidän oma -mme" ;
!+Poss+Pl1+Err/Dial:сланум PRON_POSS  "meidän oma -mme" ;
!+Poss+Pl2:сланыд PRON_POSS  "teidän oma -nne" ;
!+Poss+Pl3:сланыс PRON_POSS  "heidän oma -nsa/ niiden oma" ;

+Poss+Sg1:слам WordEnd_PredMonAdj  "minun oma -ni" ;
+Poss+Sg2:слад WordEnd_PredMonAdj  "sinun oma -si" ;
+Poss+Sg3:слас WordEnd_PredMonAdj  "hänen oma -nsa/ sen oma" ;
+Poss+Pl1:сланым WordEnd_PredMonAdj  "meidän oma -mme" ;
+Poss+Pl1+Err/Dial:сланум WordEnd_PredMonAdj  "meidän oma -mme" ;
+Poss+Pl2:сланыд WordEnd_PredMonAdj  "teidän oma -nne" ;
+Poss+Pl3:сланыс WordEnd_PredMonAdj  "heidän oma -nsa/ niiden oma" ;



LEXICON REFL_AS_01
+Sg1:с PRON_REFL_SG1_4_OBL_CASES ;
+Sg2:с PRON_REFL_SG2_4_OBL_CASES ;
+Sg3:с PRON_REFL_SG3_4_OBL_CASES ;
+Pl1:с PRON_REFL_PL1_4_OBL_CASES ;
+Pl2:с PRON_REFL_PL2_4_OBL_CASES ;
+Pl3:с PRON_REFL_PL3_4_OBL_CASES ;
:с PRON_REFL_OBL_CASES ;

+Sg1:чым PRON_REFL_SG1_4_NOM  "minä itse" ;
+Sg1+Err/Dial:чум PRON_REFL_SG1_4_NOM  "minä itse" ;

+Sg2:сьтӧ PRON_REFL_SG2_4_ACC  "" ;
+Sg2+Err/Dial:сьтэ PRON_REFL_SG2_4_ACC  "" ;
+Sg2:чыд PRON_REFL_SG2_4_CAR/ELA/NOM  "sinä itse" ;
+Sg3:сьсӧ PRON_REFL_SG3_4_ACC  "" ;
+Sg3+Err/Dial:сьсэ PRON_REFL_SG3_4_ACC  "" ;
+Sg3:чыс PRON_REFL_SG3_4_NOM  "hän itse" ;

+Pl1:сьным PRON_REFL_PL1_4_NOM  "me itse" ;
+Pl1+Err/Dial:сьнум PRON_REFL_PL1_4_NOM  "me itse" ;
+Pl2:сь PRON_REFL_PL2_4_ACC  "" ;
+Pl2:сьныд PRON_REFL_PL2_4_NOM  "te itse" ;

+Pl3:сь PRON_REFL_PL3_4_ACC  "" ;
+Pl3:сьныс PRON_REFL_PL3_4_NOM  "he/ ne itse" ;

:сладор PRON_REFL_IN_LADOR  "" ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG1_4_OBL_CASES
+Car:тӧг K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Com:кӧд K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Cns:ла K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Dat:лым K ;
+Dat+Err/Dial:лум K ;
+Ela:сьым K ;
+Ela+Err/Dial:сьум K ;
!+Ins:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3
+Ins:намӧн K ; !CHECKME

LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG2_4_OBL_CASES
+Car:тӧгыд K ; !
+Com:кӧдыд K ; !
+Car+Err/Dial:тэгыд K ; !
+Com+Err/Dial:кедыд K ; !
+Cns:лаыд K ;
+Cns:ыдла K ;
+Dat:лыд K ;
+Ela:сьыд K ;
+Ine:ад K ;
+Ins:над K ;
LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG3_4_OBL_CASES
+Car:тӧгыс K ; !
+Com:кӧдыс K ; !
+Car+Err/Dial:тэгыс K ; !
+Com+Err/Dial:кедыс K ; !
+Cns:ысла K ;
+Dat:лыс K ;
+Ela:сьыс K ;
+Ine:ас K ;
+Ins:нас K ;
